Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Subchapter 3A. Child Custody and Support
§ 665.
Rights and responsibilities order; best interests of the child.

In an action under this chapter, the court shall make an order concerning parental rights and responsibilities of any minor child of the parties. The court may order parental rights and responsibilities to be divided or shared between the parents on such terms and conditions as serve the best interests of the child. When the parents cannot agree to divide or share parental rights and responsibilities, the court shall award parental rights and responsibilities primarily or solely to one parent.

In making an order under this section, the court shall be guided by the best interests of the child and shall consider at least the following factors:

the relationship of the child with each parent and the ability and disposition of each parent to provide the child with love, affection, and guidance;

the ability and disposition of each parent to assure that the child receives adequate food, clothing, medical care, other material needs, and a safe environment;

the ability and disposition of each parent to meet the child’s present and future developmental needs;

the quality of the child’s adjustment to the child’s present housing, school, and community and the potential effect of any change;

the ability and disposition of each parent to foster a positive relationship and frequent and continuing contact with the other parent, including physical contact, except where contact will result in harm to the child or to a parent;

the quality of the child’s relationship with the primary care provider, if appropriate given the child’s age and development;

the relationship of the child with any other person who may significantly affect the child;

the ability and disposition of the parents to communicate, cooperate with each other, and make joint decisions concerning the children where parental rights and responsibilities are to be shared or divided; and

evidence of abuse, as defined in section 1101 of this title, and the impact of the abuse on the child and on the relationship between the child and the abusing parent.

The court shall not apply a preference for one parent over the other because of the sex of the child, the sex of a parent, or the financial resources of a parent.

The court may order a parent who is awarded responsibility for a certain matter involving a child’s welfare to inform the other parent when a major change in that matter occurs.

The jurisdiction granted by this section shall be limited by the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, if another state has jurisdiction as provided in that act. For the purposes of interpreting that act and any other provision of law which refers to a custodial parent, including

13 V.S.A. § 2451

, the parent with physical responsibility shall be considered the custodial parent.

The State has a compelling interest in not forcing a victim of sexual assault or sexual exploitation to continue an ongoing relationship with the perpetrator of the abuse. Such continued interaction can have traumatic psychological effects on the victim, making recovery more difficult, and negatively affect the victim’s ability to parent and to provide for the best interests of the child. Additionally, the State recognizes that a perpetrator may use the threat of pursuing parental rights and responsibilities to coerce a victim into not reporting or not assisting in the prosecution of the perpetrator for the sexual assault or sexual exploitation, or to harass, intimidate, or manipulate the victim.

The court may enter an order awarding sole parental rights and responsibilities to a parent and denying all parent-child contact with the other parent if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the nonmoving parent was convicted of sexually assaulting the moving parent and the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, or that the nonmoving parent was convicted of human trafficking pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 2652

, and the moving parent was the trafficked victim. As used in this subdivision, sexual assault shall include sexual assault as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3252

(a)

, (b), (d), and (e), aggravated sexual assault as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3253

, aggravated sexual assault of a child as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3253

a

, lewd and lascivious conduct with a child as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 2602

, and similar offenses in other jurisdictions.

The court may enter an order awarding sole parental rights and responsibilities to one parent and denying all parent-child contact between the other parent and a child if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child was conceived as a result of the nonmoving parent sexually assaulting or sexually exploiting the moving parent, or that the moving parent was trafficked by the nonmoving parent pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 2652

and the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that such an order is in the best interests of the child. A conviction is not required under this subdivision, and the court may consider other evidence of sexual assault or sexual exploitation in making its determination. For purposes of this subdivision:

sexual assault shall include sexual assault as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3252

, aggravated sexual assault as provided in 13 V.S.A. § 3253, aggravated sexual assault of a child as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3253a

, lewd and lascivious conduct with a child as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 2602

, and similar offenses in other jurisdictions; and

sexual exploitation shall include sexual exploitation of an inmate as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3257

, sexual exploitation of a minor as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 3258

, sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 1379

, and similar offenses in other jurisdictions.

Issuance of an order pursuant to this subsection shall not affect the right of the custodial parent to seek child support from the noncustodial parent.

Upon issuance of a rights and responsibilities order pursuant to this subsection, the court shall not issue a parent-child contact order and shall terminate any existing parent-child contact order concerning the child and the nonmoving parent. An order issued in accordance with this subdivision shall be permanent and shall not be subject to modification.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1993, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2011, No. 29

, § 3;

2013, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 44

, § 7, eff. May 23, 2017;

2017, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 21, 2018.

§ 665a.
Conditions of parent-child contact in cases involving domestic violence.

If within the prior ten years, one of the parents has been convicted of domestic assault or aggravated domestic assault against the other parent, or has been found to have committed abuse against a family or household member, as defined in section 1101 of this title, the court may award parent-child contact to that parent if the court finds that adequate provision can be made for the safety of the child and the parent who is a victim of domestic violence.

In a parent-child contact order issued under subsection (a) of this section, a court may:

order an exchange of a child to occur in a protected setting;

order parent-child contact supervised by another person or agency;

order the perpetrator of domestic violence to participate in, to the satisfaction of the court, a program of intervention for perpetrators, where available, or other designated counseling as a condition of the visitation;

if alcohol or drugs were involved in the domestic abuse, order the perpetrator of domestic violence to abstain from being under the influence of alcohol or controlled substances without a prescription during the visitation and for 24 hours preceding parent-child contact;

order the perpetrator of domestic violence to pay a fee to defray the costs of supervised parent-child contact, provided that the perpetrator can afford to pay the fee;

prohibit overnight parent-child contact;

impose any other condition that is deemed necessary or appropriate to provide for the safety of the child, the victim of domestic violence, or another family or household member.

Whether or not parent-child contact is allowed, the court may order the address of the child and the victim to be kept confidential.

If a court allows a family or household member to supervise parent-child contact, the court shall establish conditions to be followed during parent-child contact.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 666.
Agreements between parents.

Any agreement between the parents that divides or shares parental rights and responsibilities shall be presumed to be in the best interests of the child.

An agreement between the parties which is a complete agreement on parental rights and responsibilities shall include provisions that address at least the following:

Physical living arrangements.

Parent child contact.

Education of the minor child.

Medical, dental, and health care.

Travel arrangements.

Procedures for communicating about the child’s welfare.

If parental rights and responsibilities are to be shared or divided, procedures for resolving disputes. Such procedures may include but shall not be limited to mediation and binding arbitration.

If the court finds that an agreement between the parents is not in the best interests of the child or if the court finds that an agreement was not reached voluntarily the court shall refuse to approve the agreement.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

Construction.

Evidence.

Particular cases.

Power of court.

Rejection of agreement.

Relocation agreements.

Construction.

In a divorce action involving a child, the trial court must award parental rights and responsibilities to one parent when the parties cannot agree to divide or share these responsibilities or when the court determines that a parental agreement is not in the child’s best interests, basing the award on the best interests of the child, considering all relevant evidence, including the enumerated statutory factors; a proper decision requires a complete and balanced analysis, comparing the relevant attributes of each parent as they relate to the best interests of the child. Gilbert v. Gilbert, 163 Vt. 549, 664 A.2d 239, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 61 (1995).

Subsection (b) of this section does not require that a stipulation be a complete agreement on parental rights and responsibilities in order to be presumed to be in the best interest of the child under subsection (a) of this section. Harris v. Harris, 149 Vt. 410, 546 A.2d 208, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 55 (1988).

Evidence.

Although the trial court has broad discretion in awarding parental rights and responsibilities, it may not rest its decision entirely on improperly admitted evidence. Gilbert v. Gilbert, 163 Vt. 549, 664 A.2d 239, 1995 Vt. LEXIS 61 (1995).

Particular cases.

Despite the legislature’s determination that an agreement between the parties on the issue of parental rights and responsibilities is presumptively in the best interests of children, a court is not bound by that agreement when the evidence demonstrates that the best interests of a child requires a different result. Because automatic changes concerning who has primary rights and responsibilities were not in the best interests of children, it mattered little to what extent the trial court relied on father’s concession in crafting its order. Knutsen v. Cegalis, 2009 VT 110, 187 Vt. 99, 989 A.2d 1010, 2009 Vt. LEXIS 145 (2009).

Power of court.

In a divorce action, the court exceeded its authority by ordering joint legal parental rights and responsibility absent consent of the parties. By enacting § 666(b)(6) and (7), which requires parents who do agree to share or divide parental rights and responsibilities to nonetheless complete an agreement that addresses procedures for communicating about the child’s welfare and for resolving disputes, the Legislature recognized the difficulties inherent in shared-parenting arrangements and, in light of these provisions, it seems unlikely that the Legislature intended to allow courts to force such an arrangement on parents. Cabot v. Cabot, 166 Vt. 485, 697 A.2d 644, 1997 Vt. LEXIS 101 (1997).

Rejection of agreement.

Trial court could reject stipulation relating to legal responsibility for the parties’ children, which was filed after the hearing on the merits but before the court filed its order, only if it gave notice of its intention to the parties and gave them an opportunity to present evidence on the issues covered in the settlement. Harris v. Harris, 149 Vt. 410, 546 A.2d 208, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 55 (1988).

Relocation agreements.

There is no specific statutory authority for the divorce order to define changed circumstances for purposes of a future modification nor has the court considered such a provision; however, without deciding whether such provisions will always be effective, the court concludes that the “relocation” provision was effective in this case because it was based on a stipulation of the parties, which is presumed to be in the best interest of the children, and the “relocation” provision itself established a reasonable benchmark to determine changed circumstances. deBeaumont v. Goodrich, 162 Vt. 91, 644 A.2d 843, 1994 Vt. LEXIS 55 (1994).

Cited.

Cited in

In re B.L.V.B., 160 Vt. 368, 628 A.2d 1271, 1993 Vt. LEXIS 55 (1993); Gates v. Gates, 168 Vt. 64, 716 A.2d 794, 1998 Vt. LEXIS 149 (1998); Luce v. Cushing, 2004 VT 117, 177 Vt. 600, 868 A.2d 672, 2004 Vt. LEXIS 329 (2004) (mem.).

§ 667.
Evidence.

Evidence of conduct of a parent not related to the factors in section 665 of this title shall only be admissible for the purposes of determining parental rights and responsibilities if it is shown that the conduct affects the parent’s relationship with the child.

Reports prepared by a person qualified as an expert under the Vermont Rules of Evidence, evaluating the best interests of the child, shall be admissible for the purposes of determining parental rights and responsibilities provided that the expert is available for cross-examination.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 668.
Modification of order.

On motion of either parent or any other person to whom custody or parental rights and responsibilities have previously been granted, and upon a showing of real, substantial, and unanticipated change of circumstances, the court may annul, vary, or modify an order made under this subchapter if it is in the best interests of the child, whether or not the order is based upon a stipulation or agreement.

Whenever a judgment for physical responsibility is modified, the court shall order a child support modification hearing to be set and notice to be given to the parties. Unless good cause is shown to the contrary, the court shall simultaneously issue a temporary order pending the modification hearing, if adjustments to those portions of any existing child support order or wage withholding order that pertain to any child affected by the modification are necessary to ensure that support and wages are paid in amounts proportional to the modified allocation of responsibility between the parties.

A final order related to parental rights and responsibilities and parent-child contact issued pursuant to subdivision 665(f)(1) of this title shall not be subject to modification. A party may file a motion for modification of an order related to parental rights and responsibilities and parent-child contact issued pursuant to subdivision 665(f)(2) of this title only upon a showing of extraordinary, real, substantial, and unanticipated change of circumstances.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2011, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 668a.
Enforcement of visitation.

When a noncustodial parent who is ordered to pay child support or alimony and who is awarded visitation rights fails to pay child support or alimony, the custodial parent shall not refuse to honor the noncustodial parent’s visitation rights.

When a custodial parent refuses to honor a noncustodial parent’s visitation rights, the noncustodial parent shall not fail to pay any ordered child support or alimony.

If a custodial parent refuses to honor a noncustodial parent’s visitation rights, the court shall enforce such rights unless it finds good cause for the failure or that a modification of the visitation rights is in the best interests of the child. Unless restoration of the visitation is not in the best interests of the child, enforcement of the visitation rights shall include the restoration of the amount of visitation improperly denied. When a party files a motion for enforcement of parent-child contact under this subsection, the court shall conduct a hearing within 30 days of service of the motion.

A person who violates this section may be punished by contempt of court or other remedies as the court deems appropriate, including awarding attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party.

If a custodial parent refuses to honor a noncustodial parent’s visitation rights without good cause, the court may modify the parent-child contact order if found to be in the best interests of the child. Good cause shall include:
(e) (1) If a custodial parent refuses to honor a noncustodial parent’s visitation rights without good cause, the court may modify the parent-child contact order if found to be in the best interests of the child. Good cause shall include:

a pattern or incidence of domestic or sexual violence;

a reasonable fear for the child’s or the custodial parent’s safety; or

a history of failure to honor the visitation schedule agreed to in the parent-child contact order.

A custodial parent, upon a showing of good cause as defined in subdivision (1)(A) or (B) of this subsection, may receive an ex parte order suspending a noncustodial parent’s visitation rights until a court hearing is held. A hearing shall be held within 14 days from the issuance of the order.

All parent-child contact orders issued by the family division of the superior court in connection with a divorce or parentage proceeding shall bear the following statement: “A PERSON WHO FAILS TO COMPLY WITH ALL TERMS OF THE CURRENT ORDER GOVERNING PARENT-CHILD CONTACT MAY BE SUBJECT TO CONTEMPT OF COURT CHARGES. THE COURT MAY IMPOSE ADDITIONAL REMEDIES, INCLUDING A MODIFICATION OF THE CURRENT PARENT-CHILD CONTACT ORDER IF FOUND TO BE IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD.”

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 220

(Adj. Sess.), § 27a; amended

1995, No. 59

, § 10;

2003, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2017, No. 11

, § 40.

§ 669.
Guardian ad litem.

In all cases involving parental rights and responsibilities the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the child.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 670.
Access to records.

Access to records and information pertaining to a minor child, including but not limited to medical, dental, law enforcement, and school records shall not be denied to a parent solely because that parent has not been awarded parental rights and responsibilities.
The court may order that access to all or a portion of the records or information shall be denied if access is not in the best interest of the child or if access may cause detriment to the other parent including but not limited to abuse.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

Particular cases.

While the court is permitted by statute to restrict the noncustodial parent’s access to a child’s records, such an order must be based on the criteria set forth in the statute. Here, the family court’s order restricting the mother’s access to the child’s records was unsupported by any findings or analysis and therefore had to be reversed. Weaver v. Weaver, 2018 VT 38, 207 Vt. 236, 186 A.3d 1119, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 38 (2018).

Family court properly denied a father, the noncustodial parent, access to his sons’ mental health records, as a noncustodial parent’s general right of access to the records was subject to the child’s best interests and here, the family court found the boys could be prevented from seeking or succeeding in treatment or could be emotionally harmed by a forced disclosure. Rinehart v. Svensson, 2017 VT 33, 204 Vt. 390, 169 A.3d 198, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2017).

As the family court had extensive prior dealings with the parties and received additional briefing on the issue after remand, and neither party raised a new issue that required further fact-finding, the evidence was sufficient to support the court’s determination denying a father access to his sons’ mental health records despite the lack of a hearing and new factual findings after remand, and the opinion as a whole clearly demonstrated the family court’s proper focus on the best interests of the children. Rinehart v. Svensson, 2017 VT 33, 204 Vt. 390, 169 A.3d 198, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2017).

Statute governing access to records in child custody cases provides a noncustodial parent with a general right of access to his or her children’s records. Rinehart v. Svensson, 2017 VT 33, 204 Vt. 390, 169 A.3d 198, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2017).

Right of access.

Second sentence of the statute governing access to records in child custody cases makes plain that a noncustodial parent’s general right of access to his or her children’s records is subject to a statutory limitation. Therefore, a court can curtail a noncustodial parent’s general right of access by finding either that disclosure is not in the child’s best interests or that disclosure may harm the other parent. Rinehart v. Svensson, 2017 VT 33, 204 Vt. 390, 169 A.3d 198, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2017).

Statute governing access to records in child custody cases provides a noncustodial parent with a general right of access to his or her children’s records. Rinehart v. Svensson, 2017 VT 33, 204 Vt. 390, 169 A.3d 198, 2017 Vt. LEXIS 48 (2017).

Cited.

Cited in

Gazo v. Gazo, 166 Vt. 434, 697 A.2d 342, 1997 Vt. LEXIS 102 (1997).